Hawaii statutes.
§201-77 Pacific international space
center for exploration systems; board of directors; establishment; duties.
(a) There is established the board of directors of the Pacific international
space center for exploration systems, consisting of nine members, to include:

(1) The executive director of the space center as an
ex officio, voting member;

(2) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism, or the director's designated representative;

(3) The president of the University of Hawaii, or the
president's designated representative; and

(4) Six members from government, industry, and
academia, both national and international, with appropriate professional
interests and backgrounds,

to be appointed by the governor, pursuant to section
26-34; provided that of the members appointed under paragraph (4), two members
shall be appointed from a list of nominees submitted by the president of the
senate, two members shall be appointed from a list of nominees submitted by the
speaker of the house of representatives, and two members shall be appointed by
the governor.

The board shall select a chairperson from among
its members.

(b) Five members shall constitute a quorum,
whose affirmative vote shall be necessary for all actions by the space center.
The members of the board shall serve without compensation, but shall be
entitled to reimbursement for necessary expenses, including travel expenses,
incurred in the performance of their duties.

(c) The director of business, economic
development, and tourism shall appoint an executive director to the space
center, subject to confirmation by the board, who shall be exempt from chapter
76. The board shall set the salary and duties of the executive director. [L
2012, c 169, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 3, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next